Utah statutes.
78A-7-105.   Territorial jurisdiction -- Voting.
(1)  The territorial jurisdiction of county justice courts extends to the
limits of the precinct for which the justice court is created and includes all
cities or towns within the precinct, except cities where a municipal justice
court exists.
(2)  The territorial jurisdiction of municipal justice courts extends to the
corporate limits of the municipality in which the justice court is created.
(3)  The territorial jurisdiction of county and municipal justice courts
functioning as magistrates extends beyond the boundaries in Subsections (1)
and (2):
(a)  as set forth in Section 78A-2-220; and
(b)  to the extent necessary to carry out magisterial functions under
Subsection 77-7-23(2) regarding jailed persons.
(4)  For election of county justice court judges, all registered voters in the
county justice court precinct may vote at the judge's retention election.
